Utah statutes.
36-20-7.   Court rules or proposals for court rules -- Publication in bulletin.

When the Supreme Court or Judicial Council submits any court rule or proposal for court rule for public comment, it shall also submit the court rule or proposal for court rule to publication houses which publish court rules, proposals to court rules, case law or other relevant information for persons engaged in the legal profession.



Enacted by Chapter 282, 1993 General Session

